Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 13. Wyoming Legal Tender Act

History.

2018 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2018.

§ 9-4-1301.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Legal Tender Act.”

History.

2018 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2018.

§ 9-4-1302.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Legal tender” means a recognized medium of exchange for the payment of debts and taxes;

“Specie” means:

Coin having gold or silver content; or

Refined gold or silver bullion which is coined, stamped or imprinted with its weight and purity and valued primarily based on its metal content and not its form.

History.

2018 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2018.

§ 9-4-1303.
Specie legal tender.

Specie legal tender in Wyoming shall consist of:

Specie coin issued by the United States government at any time;

Specie coin issued by any foreign government at any time;

Any other specie that a federal court of competent jurisdiction, by final and unappealable order, rules to be within state authority to make or designate as legal tender. No court of the state of Wyoming shall be deemed to be a court of competent jurisdiction for purposes of this paragraph.

History.

2018 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2018.

§ 9-4-1304.
Taxation issues related specie and specie legal tender.

No specie or specie legal tender shall be characterized as personal property for the purposes of property taxation.

The exchange of one (1) type or form of legal tender for another type or form of legal tender shall not give rise to any tax liability of any kind.

The purchase, sale or exchange of any type or form of specie or specie legal tender shall not give rise to any tax liability of any kind.

History.

2018 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2018.

§ 9-4-1305.
Voluntary use of specie as tender.

Unless specifically provided by law or by contract, no person or legal entity shall have the right to compel any other person or legal entity to tender specie or to accept specie as legal tender.

History.

2018 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2018.